Idaho, session 2026, S1345.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-111, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-111. CERTIFICATE BY CHAIRMAN -- CHANGES IN ASSESSMENT. (1) On or
before the first Monday of September in each year, the chairman of the state
tax commission must transmit by certified mail or, by other commercial de-
livery service providing proof of delivery, or by secure electronic communi-
cation, whichever is the most cost-efficient, to the county auditor of each
county in the state, a certified statement showing all the changes in the as-
sessment of any class or all classes of property, or in the aggregate value
of all property in said county, and the total increase or decrease as a result
of all changes made by the state tax commission in the assessment of property
in said county, and the county auditor shall, upon receipt of such certified
statement, file the same in his office.
(2) In transmitting the certified statement, as prescribed in subsec-
tion (1) of this section, the chairman shall also transmit therewith the
certificate showing the total amount of state property and special state
taxes, if any, found to be due from the county, and shall also transmit
therewith a certified statement showing the assessment of any railroad,
telegraph, telephone or electric current transmission or distribution line
and all other operating property under the jurisdiction of the state tax com-


mission situated wholly or partly within the county, specifying the number
of miles, the equalized value per mile, and the total equalized value of each
line in the county, and in any taxing district into or through which such
line extends, and the name of such line, if any, and the name and post office
address of the taxpayer or owner of such line, and the county auditor shall,
upon receipt of such certified statement, file the same in his office.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-201, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-201. DEFINITIONS. As used for property tax purposes in chapters 1
through 23, title 63, Idaho Code, the terms defined in this section shall
have the following meanings, unless the context clearly indicates another
meaning:
(1) "Appraisal" means an estimate of property value for property tax
purposes.
(a) For the purpose of estimated property value to place the value on
any assessment roll, the value estimation must be made by the assessor
or a certified property tax appraiser.
(b) For the purpose of estimating property value to present for an ap-
peal filed pursuant to sections 63-501A, 63-407 and 63-409, Idaho Code,
the value estimation may be made by the assessor, a certified property
tax appraiser, a licensed appraiser, or a certified appraiser or any
party as specified by law.
(2) "Bargeline" means those water transportation tugs, boats, barges,
lighters and other equipment and property used in conjunction with waterways
for bulk transportation of freight or ship assist.
(3) "Cogenerators" means facilities that produce electric energy, and
steam or forms of useful energy that are used for industrial, commercial,
heating or cooling purposes.
(4) "Collection costs" are amounts authorized by law to be added after
the date of delinquency and collected in the same manner as property tax.
(5) "Credit card" means a card or device, whether known as a credit card
or by any other name, issued under an arrangement pursuant to which a card is-
suer gives to a cardholder the privilege of obtaining credit from the card
issuer or other person in purchasing or leasing property or services, ob-
taining loans, or otherwise.
(6) "Debit card" means any instrument or device, whether known as a
debit card or by any other name, issued with or without a fee by an issuer for
the use of the cardholder in depositing, obtaining or transferring funds.
(7) "Delinquency" means any property tax, special assessment, fee,
collection cost, or charge collected in the same manner as property tax, that
has not been paid in the manner and within the time limits provided by law.
(8) "Electronic funds transfer" means any transfer of funds that is
initiated by electronic means, such as an electronic terminal, telephone,
computer, ATM or magnetic tape.
(9) "Fixtures" means those articles that, although once movable chat-
tels, have become accessory to and a part of improvements to real property
by having been physically incorporated therein or annexed or affixed thereto
in such a manner that removing them would cause material injury or damage to
the real property, the use or purpose of such articles is integral to the use


of the real property to which it is affixed, and a person would reasonably
be considered to intend to make the articles permanent additions to the real
property. "Fixtures" includes systems for the heating, air conditioning,
ventilation, sanitation, lighting and plumbing of such building.
(10) "Floating home" means a floating structure that is designed and
built to be used, or is modified to be used, as a stationary waterborne resi-
dential dwelling.
(11) "Improvements" means all buildings, structures, manufactured
homes, as defined in section 39-4105(8), Idaho Code, mobile homes as defined
in section 39-4105(9), Idaho Code, and modular buildings, as defined in
section 39-4301(10), Idaho Code, erected upon or affixed to land, fences,
water ditches constructed for mining, manufacturing or irrigation purposes,
fixtures, and floating homes, whether or not such improvements are owned
separately from the ownership of the land upon or to which the same may be
erected, affixed or attached. The term "improvements" also includes all
fruit, nut-bearing and ornamental trees or vines not of natural growth,
growing upon the land, except nursery stock.
(12) "Late charge" means a charge of two percent (2%) of the delin-
quency.
(13) "Lawful money of the United States" means currency and coin of the
United States at par value and checks and drafts that are payable in dollars
of the United States at par value, payable upon demand or presentment.
(14) "Legal tender" means lawful money as defined in subsection (13) of
this section.
(15) "Market value" means the amount of United States dollars or equiva-
lent for which, in all probability, a property would exchange hands between a
willing seller, under no compulsion to sell, and an informed, capable buyer,
with a reasonable time allowed to consummate the sale, substantiated by a
reasonable down or full cash payment.
(16) "Operating property" means real and personal property operated
in connection with any public utility, railroad or private railcar fleet,
wholly or partly within this state, and which property is necessary to the
maintenance and operation of the public utility, railroad or private railcar
fleet, and the roads or lines thereof, and includes all rights-of-way ac-
companied by title; roadbeds; tracks; pipelines; bargelines; equipment and
docks; terminals; rolling stock; equipment; power stations; power sites;
lands; reservoirs, generating plants, transmission lines, distribution
lines and substations; and all title and interest in such property, as owner,
lessee or otherwise. The term includes electrical generation plants under
construction, whether or not owned by or operated in connection with any
public utility. For the purpose of the appraisal, assessment and taxation of
operating property, pursuant to chapter 4, title 63, Idaho Code, the value of
intangible personal property shall be excluded from the taxable value of op-
erating property in accordance with the provisions of section 63-602L, Idaho
Code, and the value of personal property, other than intangible personal
property, shall be excluded from the taxable value of operating property in
accordance with the provisions of section 63-602KK, Idaho Code. Operating
property shall be included in taxable value for the purpose of making a levy,
as required in section 63-803, Idaho Code, except when an exemption is pro-
vided or when said levy is to be made against real property only.


(17) "Party in interest" means a person who holds a recorded purchase
contract, mortgage, deed of trust, security interest, lien or lease upon the
property. For purposes of notice requirements in section 63-1009, Idaho
Code, recording includes documents recorded in full or by memorandum provid-
ing notice thereof.
(18) "Person" means any entity, individual, corporation, partnership,
firm, association, limited liability company, limited liability partner-
ship or other such entities as recognized by the state of Idaho.
(19) "Personal property" means everything that is the subject of owner-
ship and that is not included within the term "real property."
(20) "Private railcar fleet" means railroad cars or locomotives owned
by, leased to, occupied by or franchised to any person other than a railroad
company operating a line of railroad in Idaho or any company classified as a
railroad by the interstate commerce commission and entitled to possess such
railroad cars and locomotives except those possessed solely for the purpose
of repair, rehabilitation or remanufacturing of such locomotives or rail-
road cars.
(21) "Public utility" means electrical companies, pipeline companies,
natural gas distribution companies, or power producers included within fed-
eral law, bargelines, and water companies which are under the jurisdiction
of the Idaho public utilities commission. The term also includes telephone
corporations, as that term is defined in section 62-603, Idaho Code, except
as hereinafter provided, whether or not such telephone corporation has been
issued a certificate of convenience and necessity by the Idaho public utili-
ties commission. This term does not include cogenerators, mobile telephone
service or companies, nor does it include pager service or companies, except
when such services are an integral part of services provided by a certifi-
cated utility company, nor does the term "public utility" include companies
or persons engaged in the business of providing solely on a resale basis, any
telephone or telecommunication service that is purchased from a telephone
corporation or company.
(22) "Railroad" means every kind of railway, whether its line of rails
or tracks be at, above or below the surface of the earth, and without regard
to the kind of power used in moving its rolling stock, and shall be consid-
ered to include every kind of street railway, suburban railway or interur-
ban railway excepting facilities established solely for maintenance and re-
building of railroad cars or locomotives.
(23) "Real property" means land and all rights and privileges thereto
belonging or any way appertaining, all quarries and fossils in and under the
land, and all other property that the law defines, or the courts may inter-
pret, declare and hold to be real property under the letter, spirit, intent
and meaning of the law, improvements and all standing timber thereon, in-
cluding standing timber owned separately from the ownership of the land upon
which the same may stand, except as modified in chapter 17, title 63, Idaho
Code. Timber, forest, forest land, and forest products shall be defined as
provided in chapter 17, title 63, Idaho Code.
(24) "Record owner" means the person or persons in whose name or names
the property stands upon the records of the county recorder's office. Where
the record owners are husband and wife at the time of notice of pending issue


of tax deed, notice to one (1) shall be deemed and imputed as notice to the
other spouse.
(25) "Secure electronic communication" means a communication trans-
mitted securely by means of an electronic device that includes a secure
logged-in user interface process that meets federal information protection
requirements for accessing data and information or similar systems of meth-
ods that provide documents or other communication to any person by the state
tax commission. Such communication is accomplished and is deemed sent when
the notice, decision, or other document is made available in the logged-in
user interface and is deemed received upon the opening of the communication
by the recipient. Secure electronic communication shall be used only if the
recipient elects to receive documents and other information through such
means.
(25) (26) "Special assessment" means a charge imposed upon property for
a specific purpose, collected and enforced in the same manner as property
taxes.
(26) (27) "System value" means the market value for assessment purposes
of the operating property when considered as a unit.
(27) (28) "Tax code area" means a geographical area made up of one (1)
or more taxing districts with one (1) total levy within the geographic area,
except as otherwise provided by law.
(28) (29) "Taxing district" means any entity or unit with the statutory
authority to levy a property tax.
(29) (30) "Taxable value" means market value for assessment purposes,
less applicable exemptions or other statutory provisions. When statutory
provisions define taxable value as limited to real property for the purpose
of making a levy, operating property shall not be included.
(30) (31) "Transient personal property" is personal property, specifi-
cally such construction, logging or mining machinery and equipment which is
kept, moved, transported, shipped, hauled into or remaining for periods of
not less than thirty (30) days, in more than one (1) county in the state dur-
ing the same year.
(31) (32) "Warrant of distraint" means a warrant ordering the seizure of
personal property to enforce payment of property tax, special assessment,
expense, fee, collection cost or charge collected in the same manner as per-
sonal property tax.
SECTION 3. That Section 63-510, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-510. NOTIFICATION OF VALUATION DUE TO STATE TAX COMMISSION. (1)
Prior to the first Monday of August the auditor of each county in the state
shall notify the state tax commission of the net taxable value of all prop-
erty situated within each taxing unit or district in the county from the
property roll for the current year and shall provide an estimate of the net
taxable value for each taxing unit or district from the current year's es-
timated subsequent and missed property rolls. Such notification shall also
include an estimate of the net taxable value within any area annexed during
the immediate prior year to any taxing unit or district.
(2) Prior to the first Monday of March the auditor of each county in the
state shall notify the state tax commission of the net taxable value of all


property situated within each taxing unit or district in the county from the
subsequent and missed property rolls. Such notification shall also include
an estimate of the net taxable value within any area annexed during the im-
mediate prior year, and listed on the subsequent or missed property roll, to
any taxing unit or district.
(3) The notification required in subsections (1) and (2) of this sec-
tion shall be on forms prescribed and provided by the state tax commission
and shall list separately the value exempt from property taxation in accor-
dance with section 63-602G, Idaho Code, and the value in excess of the equal-
ized assessment valuation as shown on the base assessment roll in any revenue
allocation area, pursuant to chapters 20 and 29, title 50, Idaho Code.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "taxing district," as defined in
section 63-201(28) 63-201, Idaho Code, shall include each incorporated city
in each county, regardless of whether said city certifies a property tax bud-
get.
SECTION 4. That Section 63-2517, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2517. JURISDICTION OVER NONRESIDENTS. A deficiency assessed and
due and payable by a person not within the state may be prosecuted against
such person by an action in any court in this state having jurisdiction of
the subject matter, and the court shall have personal jurisdiction of such
a person in any such action for taxes imposed and assessed under this act.
Notice shall be given such person by personal service without the state or
by publication. In the event such notice shall be by publication, notice
shall also be mailed by registered or certified mail or secure electronic
communication to such person at his last known address.
SECTION 5. That Section 63-3045, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3045. NOTICE OF REDETERMINATION OR DEFICIENCY -- INTEREST.
(1)(a) If, in the case of any taxpayer, the state tax commission de-
termines that there is a deficiency in respect of the tax imposed by
this title, the state tax commission shall, immediately upon discovery
thereof, send notice of such deficiency to the taxpayer by first class
mail or, by other commercial delivery service providing proof of de-
livery, or by secure electronic communication, whichever is the most
cost-efficient. The notice shall be sent to the taxpayer's last address
known to the state tax commission. The notice of deficiency shall be
accompanied by an explanation of the specific reason for the determi-
nation and an explanation of the taxpayer's right to appeal. Within
sixty-three (63) days after such notice is mailed sent, the taxpayer
may, at his option, file a protest in writing with the state tax commis-
sion and obtain redetermination of the deficiency.
(b) If the taxpayer files a protest with the state tax commission within
the period set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection, and such
protest does not comply with the rules of the state tax commission and
is therefore inadequate to perfect the taxpayer's right to a redetermi-
nation of the deficiency determination, then the state tax commission


shall notify the taxpayer, in the same manner as set forth in paragraph
(a) of this subsection, of such inadequacies, setting forth in said
notice the corrective action to be taken by the taxpayer to perfect his
protest. The taxpayer shall thereafter have twenty-eight (28) days
from the date of said notice to perfect his protest.
(c) No assessment of a deficiency in respect to the tax imposed by this
chapter, and no distraint or proceedings in court for its collection,
shall be made, begun, or prosecuted until such notice has been mailed
sent to the taxpayer, nor until all appeal rights relating to the defi-
ciency have become final.
(2)(a) Following a perfected protest, the taxpayer has the right to
an independent administrative redetermination of the originating di-
vision's determination before the state tax commission, including a
hearing. The purpose of the hearing is to discuss the deficiency de-
termination and the taxpayer's protest with a commissioner or duly
authorized representative of the commission. The meeting shall be
held informally and evidence shall be freely admitted regardless of the
rules of evidence.
(b) Tax commission staff assigned to the administrative redetermi-
nation may not engage in communications relating to the taxpayer's
protest with employees of the originating division without first
providing the taxpayer the opportunity to participate, except for ques-
tions that involve ministerial, administrative or procedural matters
that do not address the substance of the issues or positions taken in the
case or as otherwise allowed under title 63, Idaho Code, and the rules
promulgated thereunder. The state tax commission shall promulgate
rules governing communications with the originating division to ensure
an independent review process. The provisions of this subsection do
not create a substantive right affecting the taxpayer's tax liability
or the state tax commission's ability to determine, assess or collect
that tax liability, including statutory interest and any penalties, if
applicable.
(3) Any hearing conducted under the provisions of this section may
be conducted, in whole or in part, by telephone, television, or other
electronic means if each participant in the hearing has an opportunity to
participate in the entire proceeding while it is taking place.
(4) A taxpayer has the right to be represented by, or be accompanied by,
any person of his choice in any proceeding before the tax commission. If the
taxpayer is not present at a proceeding, the representative of that taxpayer
must be designated in writing by the taxpayer as shall be prescribed in ad-
ministrative rules or in any manner acceptable to the tax commission.
(5) Following a perfected protest, the taxpayer may submit additional
evidence or documentation during the redetermination process subject to the
provisions of section 63-3045B(3)(a), Idaho Code.
(6) If the taxpayer does not file a protest with the state tax commis-
sion within the time prescribed in subsection (1)(a) of this section, the de-
ficiency shall be assessed and shall become due and payable upon notice and
demand from the state tax commission.
(7)(a) Interest shall apply to deficiencies in tax and refunds of tax.
Interest shall not apply to any penalty or to unpaid accrued interest.


Interest relating to deficiencies or refunds accruing after the origi-
nal due date of the return, but not including extensions of the due date,
shall be computed on the net of any underpayments and overpayments of a
tax liability required to be shown as due on the same return. Interest
on deficiencies shall not accrue for any period beginning on the date
on which the state tax commission identifies a return for possible au-
dit until the date of the issuance of a notice of deficiency determina-
tion. Nor shall interest on deficiencies accrue for any period between
the issuance of a notice of deficiency determination that is subject to
a perfected protest and the final determination of the deficiency by the
state tax commission following the state tax commission's disposition
of the protest.
(b) Interest upon any deficiency shall be assessed at the same time as
the deficiency, shall be due and payable upon notice and demand from
the state tax commission and shall be collected as a part of the tax at
the rate per annum determined under the provisions of paragraph (c) of
this subsection from the date prescribed for the payment of the tax.
In the event any of the deficiency is reduced by reason of a carryback
of a net operating loss or a capital loss carryback, such reduction in
deficiency shall not affect the computation of interest under this sub-
section for the period ending with the last day of the taxable year in
which the net operating loss or capital loss arises.
(c) The rate of interest accruing during any calendar year, or portion
thereof, upon any deficiency, or payable upon an overpayment or re-
fund, shall be two percent (2%) plus the rate determined under section
1274(d), Internal Revenue Code, by the secretary of the treasury of the
United States as the midterm federal rate as it applies on September 15
of the immediately preceding calendar year rounded to the nearest whole
number.
(8) When the time provisions contained in this section conflict with
the provisions of section 63-4208, Idaho Code, relating to the assessment of
taxes on illegal possession of controlled substances, the provisions of sec-
tion 63-4208, Idaho Code, shall prevail.
SECTION 6. That Section 63-3045B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3045B. FINAL DECISIONS OF THE COMMISSION. (1) If a taxpayer does
not file a protest within the sixty-three (63) day period allowed, the no-
tice of deficiency of the tax commission becomes final on the day following
the end of the protest period.
(2) If a taxpayer files a protest, but does not perfect the protest,
the notice of deficiency of the tax commission becomes final on the twenty-
ninth day following the date the tax commission notified the taxpayer that
the protest was not perfected, except that the tax commission may reduce the
amount of the deficiency during the twenty-nine (29) day period.
(3) When a perfected protest has been filed, the state tax commission
shall, within fourteen (14) days thereof, provide the taxpayer with a writ-
ten acknowledgment of the protest. After the acknowledgment, a final deci-
sion of the tax commission must be rendered within one hundred eighty (180)
days from either:


(a) A request in writing, in a form prescribed by rules of the tax com-
mission, from the taxpayer for a final decision on that issue; if the
taxpayer requests such a decision, the tax commission may refuse to ac-
cept additional evidence or documentation or refuse to allow an appear-
ance at any proceeding with the commission or any representative of the
commission during such one hundred eighty (180) day period; or
(b) The conclusion of any hearing pursuant to section 63-3045(2)(a),
Idaho Code, and the taxpayer has not requested or received any extension
of time to present additional evidence or testimony.
(4) A final decision may be held in abeyance, notwithstanding the re-
quirements of subsection (3) of this section, with the prior approval in
writing of the taxpayer.
(5) If a final decision of the tax commission is not rendered or the
protest is not resolved by compromise, consent or withdrawal of the notice of
deficiency determination within the time limits established by subsection
(3) of this section, the notice of deficiency shall be null and void ab ini-
tio, with prejudice.
(6) A final decision of the tax commission shall be issued in writing
and mailed, delivered through secure electronic communication, or served
upon the taxpayer within the time limits set forth herein. The final written
decision of the tax commission shall, one hundred twenty (120) days after the
date of the final written decision, be available for public inspection and
copying pursuant to the provisions of section 74-102, Idaho Code, except:
(a) The taxpayer's name, address, taxpayer identification number, so-
cial security number, permit number, or other identifying information
shall be removed from the final written decision of the tax commission
that is made available to the public; and
(b) Any proprietary or other identifying information contained in the
written decision that the taxpayer requests be excised shall be excised
by the tax commission in the final written decision made available
to the public. The taxpayer must make such request in writing before
ninety-one (91) days have elapsed after the date of the final decision.
(7) The tax commission shall label each written decision with a unique
identification number and shall keep a list containing each decision num-
ber and the date of issuance, as excised in accordance with the provisions
of this section. A decision shall serve as precedent for the tax commis-
sion in future protest determinations unless information excised, court de-
cisions, changes in the Idaho Code, or changes in applicable administrative
rules overrule, supersede, modify, distinguish, or otherwise make inappli-
cable the written decision of the tax commission.
SECTION 7. That Section 63-3061A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3061A. NOTICE OF LEVY AND DISTRAINT. (1) The state tax commission
shall, at the time of levy, provide to the taxpayer and to any person in pos-
session of the property subject to distraint, written notice of levy and dis-
traint. The written notice of levy and distraint may be:
(a) (1) Given in person;
(b) (2) Left at the dwelling place or usual place of business of such
person; or


(c) (3) Sent by first class mail to such person's last known address.;
or
(2) (4) Service may be made by other means, including electronic means
as provided in chapter 50, title 28, Idaho Code, the uniform electronic
transactions act, when agreed upon by the state tax commission and the party
served Delivered through secure electronic communication.
SECTION 8. That Section 63-3065A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3065A. JURISDICTION OVER NONRESIDENTS. A deficiency assessed and
due and payable by a person not within the state may be prosecuted against
such person by an action in any court having jurisdiction of the subject
matter or in personam jurisdiction of such person in any action for taxes,
penalty and interest owed the state tax commission. Notice shall be given
and the action shall proceed in accordance with the applicable rules and
statutes regulating civil procedure. In the event such notice shall be by
publication, notice shall also be mailed by certified mail or secure elec-
tronic communication to such person at his last known address.
SECTION 9. That Section 63-3620C, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3620C. PROMOTER-SPONSORED EVENTS. (1) The operator or promoter
contracting with persons for participation in a promoter sponsored event,
as a prerequisite to renting or leasing space to any person for conducting
business as a retailer on any premises owned or controlled by that operator
or promoter, shall obtain:
(a) Written evidence that the retailer holds a valid seller's permit
issued pursuant to this chapter or will apply to the state tax commis-
sion for a regular or temporary seller's permit; or
(b) A written statement from the retailer that the retailer is not of-
fering for sale any item that is taxable under this chapter or is other-
wise not required to hold a valid seller's permit.
(2) Such written evidence or statements shall be in such form and con-
tain such information as the state tax commission shall require. The opera-
tor or promoter shall submit the documents to the state tax commission within
ten (10) days following the beginning of the event.
(3)(a) The state tax commission may appoint a sponsor or promoter as
its agent for issuing temporary seller's permits to participants in the
event and for accounting for such permits.
(b) A sponsor or promoter appointed to issue temporary permits under
this subsection shall be entitled to a credit or refund of income or
franchise taxes imposed under chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, in the
amount of one dollar ($1.00) for each such temporary permit issued by
the sponsor or promoter during the taxable year.
(4) Any operator or promoter of a promoter-sponsored event who fails to
comply with this section may be subject to a minimum penalty of fifty dollars
($50.00) per event and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each seller over two
(2) sellers for whom such records required by subsection (1) of this section
are not obtained, but not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each


such event. Under no circumstances, shall an operator or a promoter be re-
sponsible for sales or use tax not remitted by a retailer at a promoter-spon-
sored event.
(5) The penalties provided in subsection (4) of this section shall not
apply:
(a) Unless the state tax commission shall have previously given notice
to the operator or promoter or its officer, agent or employee, by cer-
tified mail or secure electronic communication, of the requirements of
this section and of a violation of this section by the operator or pro-
moter or its officer, agent or employee; or
(b) If the operator or promoter shows that such failure was due to rea-
sonable cause and not to willful neglect.
(6) The state tax commission shall give notice of any penalty provided
in this section and it shall assess such penalties in the manner provided for
deficiencies of tax.
(7) "Promoter-sponsored event," as used in this section, means a swap
meet, flea market, gun show, fair or similar activity involving a series
of sales sufficient in number, scope and character to constitute a regu-
lar course of business; or any event at which two (2) or more persons offer
tangible personal property or services for sale or exchange and at which a
fee is charged for the privilege of offering the services or displaying the
property for sale or exchange; or at which a fee is charged to prospective
buyers for admission to the area where the property or services are offered
or displayed for sale or exchange.
SECTION 10. That Section 63-4003, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-4003. COMMUNICATION IN CONNECTION WITH TAX COLLECTION. (1) Without
the prior consent of the taxpayer or the express permission of a court of com-
petent jurisdiction, a revenue officer may not communicate with a taxpayer
in connection with the collection of any tax obligation:
(a) At any unusual time or place or a time or place known or which should
be known to be inconvenient to the taxpayer. In the absence of knowledge
of circumstances to the contrary, a revenue officer shall presume that
the convenient time for communicating with a taxpayer is after 8 o'clock
antemeridian and before 9 o'clock postmeridian, local time at the tax-
payer's location;
(b) If the tax commission has been notified in writing that the taxpayer
is represented with respect to such tax obligation and has knowledge of,
or can readily ascertain such representative's name and address, unless
the representative fails to respond within seven (7) days to a communi-
cation with the taxpayer, except:
(i) To advise the taxpayer that the revenue officer's further ef-
forts are being terminated;
(ii) To notify the taxpayer as required by law that the revenue of-
ficer may invoke specified remedies which are ordinarily invoked
by such revenue officer;
(iii) Where applicable, to notify the taxpayer that the revenue
office intends to invoke a specified remedy;


(iv) In regard to matters not within the scope of the notice of the
representative's capacity;
but nothing shall prohibit the tax commission from copying to the tax-
payer all written communications with the taxpayer's representative;
or
(c) At the taxpayer's place of employment if the revenue officer knows
or has reason to know that the taxpayer's employer prohibits the tax-
payer from receiving such communication.
(2) The taxpayer shall be provided the option to receive communications
in connection with the collection of any tax obligation through secure elec-
tronic communication as defined in section 63-201, Idaho Code.
(2) (3) Except as provided in chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, or sec-
tion 63-4002, Idaho Code, without the prior consent of the taxpayer, or the
express permission of a court of competent jurisdiction, or as reasonably
necessary to effectuate a postjudgment judicial remedy, a revenue officer
may not communicate, in connection with the collection of any tax obliga-
tion, with any person other than the taxpayer, or his representative.
(3) (4) If a taxpayer notifies a revenue officer in writing that the
taxpayer refuses to pay a tax obligation or that the taxpayer wishes the rev-
enue officer to cease further communication with the taxpayer, the revenue
officer shall not communicate further with the taxpayer with respect to such
tax obligation, except:
(a) To advise the taxpayer that the revenue officer's further efforts
are being terminated;
(b) To notify the taxpayer as required by law that the revenue officer
may invoke specified remedies which are ordinarily invoked by such rev-
enue officer; or
(c) Where applicable, to notify the taxpayer that the revenue officer
intends to invoke a specified remedy.
If such notice from the taxpayer is made by mail, notification shall be
complete upon receipt.
SECTION 11. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby de-
clared to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application
of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any
reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining por-
tions of this act.
SECTION 12. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.